Hawaii, session 2025, HB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. PART II SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF 102) the following sum or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023‑2025 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining units (2), (3), (4), (8), (9), (10), (13), and (14) and their excluded counterparts. These amounts are in addition to the amounts provided in Act 49, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024: FY 2024-2025 General funds            $79,197,312 SECTION 3. Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. Part III SECTION 4.  There are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF102) the following sums or so much there of as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023-2025 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining units (1) and (10) and their excluded counterparts.  These are for separate arbitration awards for the department of education, the University of Hawaii, and other state departments: FY 2024-2025 General funds $14,000,000 Special funds $19,831,113 Federal Funds $12,833,567 Other federal funds          $590,263 Trust Funds $68,778 Interdepartmental transfers  $160,190 Revolving funds              $593,939 SECTION 5.  Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART IV SECTION 6. There is appropriated from the source of funding indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation  corporate office (HTH 210) the following sum or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal year 2023‑2025 the collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining units (1) and (10) who are assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation: FY 2024-2025 General funds $11,540,875 SECTION 7. Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. Part V SECTION 8.  There are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023-2025 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (11) and their excluded counterparts: FY 2024-2025 General funds               $960,600 Special Funds $5,140,600 SECTION 9.  Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. Part VI SECTION 10. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be, from the respective funds, provided that if the respective funds are unable to support such payments, appropriations from other means of financing may be used with the approval of the Governor. SECTION 11. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 12.  In accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and 37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined that at the beginning of the regular session of 2025, the general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 was exceeded by $8,551,795 or one per cent.  The appropriations contained in Act 1, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025 caused the general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be further exceeded by an additional $30,334,159.  Therefore, the general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 has already been exceeded by $38,885,954 or 1 per cent. The appropriations contained in this Act will cause the general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be further exceeded by $105,698,787, or 1 per cent.  This declaration takes into account the additional general fund appropriations authorized for fiscal year 2024-2025 in this Act only.  The reasons for exceeding the general fund expenditure ceiling are that the appropriations made in this Act are necessary to serve the public interest and to meet the needs addressed by this Act. SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.